ko: FM 송신기 재생 소스: Aux 입력; Bluetooth; 라인 입력; MicroSD 카드; TF 카드; USB 플래시 드라이브; 기타
lt-LT: FM siųstuvo atkūrimo šaltinis: Aux įvestis; „Bluetooth“; Linijinė įvestis; MicroSD kortelė; TF kortelė; USB atmintinė; Kita
hr-HR: Izvor reprodukcije FM odašiljača: Aux ulaz; Bluetooth; Linijski ulaz; MicroSD kartica; TF kartica; USB Flash memorija; Ostalo
pl: Źródło odtwarzania nadajnika FM: Wejście aux; Bluetooth; Wejście liniowe; Karta microSD; Karta TF; Napęd flash USB; Inne
th: แหล่งเล่นเครื่องส่ง FM: ช่องเสียบ Aux; บลูทูธ; ไลน์อิน; การ์ด MicroSD; การ์ด TF; แฟลชไดรฟ์ USB; อื่นๆ
tr: FM verici oynatma kaynağı: Aux girişi; Bluetooth; Hat girişi; MicroSD kart; TF kart; USB bellek; Diğer
pt-PT: Fonte de reprodução do transmissor FM: Entrada auxiliar; Bluetooth; Entrada de linha; Cartão microSD; Cartão TF; Pen USB; Outro
ro-RO: Sursa de redare a transmițătorului FM: Intrare aux; Bluetooth; Intrare linie; Card microSD; Card TF; USB flash drive; Altele
en: FM Transmitter playback source: Aux input; Bluetooth; Line-in; MicroSD card; TF card; USB flash drive; Other
sk-SK: Zdroj prehrávania FM vysielača: Aux vstup; Bluetooth; Linkový vstup; MicroSD karta; TF karta; USB flash disk; Iné
cs: Zdroj přehrávání FM vysílače: Aux vstup; Bluetooth; Linkový vstup; MicroSD karta; TF karta; USB flash disk; Jiné
sl-SI: Vir predvajanja FM oddajnika: Pomožni vhod; Bluetooth; Linijski vhod; MicroSD kartica; TF kartica; USB bliskovni pogon; Drugo
it: Sorgente di riproduzione trasmettitore FM: Ingresso aux; Bluetooth; Line-in; Scheda microSD; Scheda TF; Unità flash USB; Altro
es: Fuente de reproducción del transmisor FM: Entrada auxiliar; Bluetooth; Entrada de línea; Tarjeta microSD; Tarjeta TF; Unidad flash USB; Otros
sv: FM-sändares uppspelningskälla: Aux-ingång; Bluetooth; Line-in; MicroSD-kort; TF-kort; USB-minne; Övrigt
hu: FM-adó lejátszási forrása: Aux bemenet; Bluetooth; Vonalbemenet; MicroSD kártya; TF kártya; USB flash meghajtó; Egyéb
ja: FMトランスミッター再生ソース: AUX 入力; Bluetooth; ライン入力; microSD カード; TF カード; USBフラッシュドライブ; その他
nl: FM-zender afspeelbron: Aux-ingang; Bluetooth; Lijningang; MicroSD-kaart; TF-kaart; USB-stick; Andere
fr: Source de lecture de l’émetteur FM: Entrée auxiliaire; Bluetooth; Entrée ligne; Carte MicroSD; Carte TF; Clés USB; Autre
de: FM-Sender-Wiedergabequelle: Aux-Eingang; Bluetooth; Line-Eingang; MicroSD-Karte; TF-Karte; USB-Stick; Sonstiges
vi: Nguồn phát lại bộ phát FM: Đầu vào Aux; Bluetooth; Line-in; Thẻ MicroSD; Thẻ TF; Ổ đĩa USB Flash; Khác
zh-TW: FM 發射器播放來源: Aux 輸入; 藍牙; Line-in 輸入; MicroSD 卡; TF 卡; 隨身碟; 其他
ru: Источник воспроизведения FM-передатчика: Вход Aux; Bluetooth; Линейный вход; Карта MicroSD; Карта TF; Флеш-накопитель USB; Другой
bg-BG: Източник на възпроизвеждане на FM предавател: Aux вход; Bluetooth; Линеен вход; MicroSD карта; TF карта; USB флаш устройство; Други
da: FM-senderens afspilningskilde: Aux-indgang; Bluetooth; Line-in; MicroSD-kort; TF-kort; USB-flashdrev; Andet
zh-CN: FM 发射器播放源: Aux 输入; 蓝牙; 线路输入; MicroSD 卡; TF 卡; USB 闪存驱动器/U 盘; 其他
el: Πηγή αναπαραγωγής πομπού FM: Είσοδος Aux; Bluetooth; Είσοδος γραμμής; Κάρτα MicroSD; Κάρτα TF; Οδηγός USB; Άλλο
fi: FM-lähettimen toistolähteet: Aux-tulo; Bluetooth; Linjatulo; MicroSD-kortti; TF-kortti; USB-muistitikku; Muu
nb: FM-sender avspillingskilde: Aux-inngang; Bluetooth; Linjeinngang; MicroSD-kort; TF-kort; Minnepenn; Annet
pt-BR: Fonte de reprodução do transmissor FM: Entrada aux; Bluetooth; Entrada de linha; Cartão MicroSD; Cartão TF; Flash Drive USB; Outro